Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,151
Construction of contract; before or after breach.

A contract may be construed either before or after there has been a breach thereof.

Laws 1929, c. 75, § 3, p. 257;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,142;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,151.

A contract may be construed under Declaratory Judgments Act either before or after there has been a breach thereof. Dorland v. Dorland, 175 Neb. 233, 121 N.W.2d 28 (1963).

Action is authorized after breach of contract of insurance. Hawkeye Casualty Co. v. Stoker, 154 Neb. 466, 48 N.W.2d 623 (1951).